Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.445

Wood destroying organism inspections—License required.

It is unlawful for any business to conduct complete wood destroying organism inspections without having obtained a company license from the director. Application for a structural pest inspection company license must be on a form prescribed by the director. The application must include the following information:

(1) The full name of the individual applying for such license;

(2) The full name of the company that employs structural pest inspectors;

(3) The physical and mailing addresses of the company, and the telephone and facsimile numbers, if available;

(4) A list of the names of the structural pest inspectors who are employed by the company;

(5) The unique business identifier for the company; and

(6) Any other necessary information prescribed by the director.

Any changes to the information on the prescribed structural pest inspection company license form shall be reported by the company to the department within thirty days of the change.

[ 2003 c 212 s 8.]